test/src/morphology/noun-roots_gt-norm.yaml
# yaml test generated from src/morphology/stems/noun.lexc with doccomments2yaml.awk
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst

Tests:
  N: #
    talo+N+Sg+Nom: talo # 
    talo+N+Sg+Par: taloa # 
    talo+N+Pl+Ine: taloissa # 
    talo+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: talostani # 
    talo+N+Sg+Ade+Qst: talollako # 
    talo+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1+Foc/pa: taloiltammepa # 
    talo+N+Sg+Par: taloa # 
    sälö+N+Pl+Par: sälöjä # 
    valtio+N+Pl+Par: valtioita # 
    lepakko+N+Pl+Nom: lepakot # 
    pata+N+Pl+Ine: padoissa # 
